software/apertium.11.22.2017/apertium-en-es/apertium-en-es.en-lextor.dix
<pardef n="arabic-roman-ord">
    <e><p><l>10th</l><r>10th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>11th</l><r>11th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>12th</l><r>12th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>13th</l><r>13th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>14th</l><r>14th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>15th</l><r>15th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>16th</l><r>16th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>17th</l><r>17th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>18th</l><r>18th</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>19th</l><r>19th</r></p></e>

    <e><par n="arabic-roman-tens-ord"/></e>

    </pardef>
<pardef n="B.C.-a._C.">
    <e><p><l/><r/></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>BC</l><r><b/>BC</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>B.C</l><r><b/>B.C</r></p></e>

    

    <e><p><l><b/>B.<b/>C</l><r><b/>B.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>AD</l><r><b/>AD</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>A.D</l><r><b/>A.D</r></p></e>

    

    <e><p><l><b/>A.<b/>D</l><r><b/>A.<b/>D</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>CE</l><r><b/>CE</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>C.E</l><r><b/>C.E</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>C.<b/>E</l><r><b/>C.<b/>E</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>BCE</l><r><b/>BCE</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>B.C.E</l><r><b/>B.C.E</r></p></e>

    

    

    

    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e><p><l/><r/></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>century</l><r><b/>century</r></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l/><r/></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>and<b/></l><r><b/>and<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>centuries</l><r><b/>centuries</r></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l/><r/></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l>-</l><r>-</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>centuries</l><r><b/>centuries</r></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
